Tennessee, session 114, HB1863.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The Tennessee higher education commission (THEC) shall submit a one-
time report to the education committee of the senate; the committee of the house of
representatives having jurisdiction over higher education; the finance, ways and means
committee of the senate; and the committee of the house of representatives having
jurisdiction over finance that identifies any fiscal year since 2004 for which net lottery
proceeds were insufficient to fully fund the scholarships and grants created by
Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 4, Part 9, resulting in:
(1) A pro rata reduction in the amounts awarded for any such
scholarships and grants pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-
903; or
(2) A draw upon the general shortfall reserve subaccount created in
Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-51-111(b)(3) to meet any deficiency in
the net lottery proceeds in the lottery for education account to cover the amount
appropriated for educational programs and purposes pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 4-51-111(c).
(b) THEC shall submit the report required in subsection (a) no later than October
1, 2027. The report must include the information described in subsection (a) for each
HB1863
011088
- 1 -

fiscal year beginning with the 2004 fiscal year and continuing through the 2026 fiscal
year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011088